en: chia
xx: chia
bg: чиа
es: chía negra
hr: biljke chia
la: Salvia hispanica
nl: chia
pl: szałwia hiszpańska, chia, salvia hispanica, szałwii hiszpańskiej

en: chia seed, chia seeds
ar: بذرة الشيا
bg: семена от чиа, чиа семена
bn: চিয়া বীজ
cs: chia semínka
da: chiafrø, chia frø
de: Chiasamen, chia Samen
es: semillas de chia, chia
et: Õlisalvei seemned
fi: chia-siemen, chia-siemenet, chiansiemen
fr: graine de chia, graines de chia
he: זרעי צ'יה
hi: चिया सीड्ज़
hr: chia sjemenke
is: Chiafræ
it: semi di chia
ja: チアシード
jv: Wiji chia
lv: čia sēklas
nb: Chiafrø
nl: chiazaad
pl: nasiona chia, nasiona szałwii hiszpańskiej, nasion chia
pt: sementes de chia
ro: semințe de chia, seminte de chia
sr: Семенке чиа
sv: chiafrö, chiafrön
th: เมล็ดชีอา
zh: 奇亞籽

en: white chia seed, white chia seeds
fr: graine de chia blanches
nl: witte chiazaad

en: cottonseed, cotton seed
de: Baumwollsaat
es: semillas de algodón
fr: graine de coton
hr: pamuk
it: semi di cotone
nl: katoenzaad

en: cumin
af: komyn
ar: كمون
as: জীৰা
az: adi cirə
be: зіра
bg: кимион
bn: জিরা
br: koumin
ca: comí
cs: římský kmín, kmín římský, kumin
cy: cwmin
da: spidskommen
de: kreuzkümmel, römischer kümmel, cumin, kumin
dv: ދިރި
el: κύμινο
eo: kumino
es: comino
eu: kumino
fa: زیره سبز
fi: roomankumina, juustokumina, jeera
fr: cumin
ga: cuimín
gl: comiño
gu: જીરું
he: כמון
hi: जीरा
hr: kumin, kumim
hu: kömény, római kömény
id: jintan putih
io: kumino
it: cumino, cumino romano, comino común
ja: クミン
jv: jinten putih
kk: зира
kn: ಜೀರಿಗೆ
ko: 쿠민
ku: reşke
lt: kuminas
lv: kumīns
ml: ജീരകം
mr: जिरे
ms: jintan putih
mt: kemmun
my: ဇီယာ
nb: spisskummen, spisskum, spisskarve
ne: जीरा
nl: komijn
nn: kummin, spisskummen, spisskum
or: ଜିରା
os: зира
pa: ਜੀਰਾ
pl: kmin rzymski, kumin, kuminu, kminu rzymskiego
pt: cominho
ro: chimion
ru: зира, кумин, тмин
sa: जीरकम्
sd: اڇو جيرو
si: සූදුරු
sl: orientalska kumina
sr: кумин, kumin
su: jinten bodas
sv: spiskummin
sw: jira
ta: சீரகம்
te: జీలకర్ర
tg: зира
th: ยีหร่า
tl: komino
tr: kimyon
uk: зіра
uz: zira
vi: thì là ai cập
zh: 孜然

en: cumin seeds
ca: llavor de comí, llavors de comí
de: Kümmelkörner
es: semilla de comino, grano de comino
fi: juustokuminansiemen
fr: graine de cumin, cumin en grains
he: זרעי כמון
hr: kim zrno
hu: köménymag
it: grano di cumino, grani di cumino
nb: spisskummen frø
nl: komijnzaad, komijnzaden
pl: nasiona kminu rzymskiego, nasiona kuminu, nasiona kminu
pt: semente de cominhos, sementes de cominhos
ru: зёрна кумина
sv: spiskumminfrön

en: fennel seed
ca: fruit del fonoll
da: fennikelfrø
de: Fenchelsamen, Fenchelsaat
es: Semilla de hinojo, Semillas de hinojo
fi: fenkolinsiemen, fenkolin siemen
fr: graine de fenouil, graines de fenouil
hr: sjeme komorača
it: seme di finocchio, semi di finocchio
ja: フェンネルシード
la: Foeniculi Fructus
nb: fennikelfrø
nl: Venkelzaad
ru: плод фенхеля
sv: fänkålsfrö, fänkålsfrön

en: pine nuts, pine nut kernels, pinenuts
ar: حبوب الصنوبر
ba: кедр сәтләүеге
bg: кедрови ядки
ca: pinyó, pinyons
da: pinjekerner
de: Pinienkerne
el: Κουκουνάρι
eo: Pinsemo
es: Piñón, piñones, Piñores crudos y pelados
et: seedermännipähkel
eu: Pinazi
fa: دانه کاج
fi: pinjansiemen
fr: pignon de pin, pignons de pin, pignons, pignons de pin décortiqués, Pignons de pin décortiqués et pelés, Pignons de pin décortiqués - pelés et brossés, noix de pin, Pignons de pin épluchés, Pignons de pin décortiqués pelés et brossés
ga: Piñón
he: צנובר
hr: pinjole
hu: Fenyőmag
id: Kacang pinus
it: pinoli, pinolo
ja: 松の実
ko: 잣
ku: Fistiqên çaman
la: Nucleus pineus
nb: pinjekjerne
nl: pijnboompitten, Pijnboompit
nn: russenøtter
nv: Neeshchʼííʼ
oc: Pinhon
pa: چناٹو
pl: orzeszki piniowe, orzeszki pinii, orzechy piniowe, orzechy pinii
pt: pinhão
ru: кедровый орех
sr: пињол, pinjoli
sv: pinjenötter, pinjekärnor
tl: Pinyon
tr: Çam fıstığı
uk: кедрові горішки
zh: 松子

en: Siberian pine
xx: Pinus sibirica
fr: pignons de pin de sibérie
la: Pinus sibirica

en: European pine
it: pino europeo
la: Pinus Pinea

en: Korean pine
xx: Pinus koraiensis
la: Pinus koraiensis

en: roasted pin nuts
it: noci tostate
nb: Tørristede pinjekjerner

en: flax
ca: lli
de: Flachs
es: lino
fi: pellava
fr: lin
hr: lan, lana
it: lino
lv: lini
nl: lijn
pl: len, lnu
pt: Linho

en: flax seed, flax seeds, flaxseed, linseed, linseeds, linseed seeds
bg: Ленено семе
cs: Len setý, lněna seminka, lněná semínka
da: Hørfrø
de: Leinsamen, Leinsaat, Leinsaaten
es: semillas de lino, semillas de linaza, linaza
et: Linaseemned, linaseeme
fa: تخم کتان
fi: pellavansiemen, pellavansiemenet, pellavansiemeniä
fr: graine de lin, graines de lin
hr: lanene sjemenke, lan sjemenke
hu: Lenmag
it: semi di lino
lv: linu sēklas, linsēklas
nb: linfrø
nl: lijnzaad
nn: linfrø
pl: Siemię lniane, nasiona lnu, siemienia lnianego, nasion lnu
pt: linhaça
ro: semințe de in
ru: семена льна
sv: linfrön, linfrö
tr: keten

en: golden flax seeds, golden linseed, yellow flax seeds
bg: златно ленено семе
de: goldgelbe Leinsaat, Gold-Leinsaat
es: semillas de lino dorado, lino dorado
fr: graines de lin doré, graines de lin jaune
hr: sjemenke zlatnog lana
it: semi di lino giallo
nl: geel lijnzaad, lijnzaad geel
pl: siemię lniane złote
pt: sementes de linho amarelo
sv: gula linfrö

en: brown flax seeds, brown linseed, Brown flaxseed
bg: кафяво ленено семе, кафяв лен
da: brune hørfrø
de: brauner Leinsamen
es: linaza marron, lino marron
fi: ruskeat pellavansiemenet
fr: graines de lin brun, lin brun
hr: sjemenke smeđeg lana
it: semi di lino scuro
nl: bruin lijnzaad
nn: brune linfrø
pl: siemię lniane brązowe
sv: bruna linfrö

en: hemp seed
de: Hanfsamen, hanfsaat
es: Semilla de cáñamo, semillas de Cáñamo Sativa L
fi: hampunsiemen, hampunsiemenet
fr: graines de chanvre
hr: sjeme konoplje
it: semi di canapa
nl: hennepzaad

en: hemp seed flour
de: Hanfmehl, Hanfsamenmehl
es: harina de semillas de Cáñamo Sativa L
hr: brašno od sjemenki konoplje
it: farina di semi di canapa

en: hemp seed oil
de: Hanföl, Hanfsamenöl
es: aciete de semillas de Cáñamo Sativa L
hr: ulje sjemenki konoplje
it: olio di semi di canapa

en: hemp seed paste
de: Hanfsamenmus
it: pasta di semi di canapa